src/morphology/stemparts/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_TÄYSI
[CMP=POS]:si A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:te A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:de A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:t A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:te A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:t A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:de    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:s    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;





LEXICON A_TYVEN
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:e    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AVOIN
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:me    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:m     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:me    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:m A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:m A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:m A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:me    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:m    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_ALASTON
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ma    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:m     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:n   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:ma    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:m     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:m     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ma    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:n   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:m A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:m    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VIATON
[CMP=POS]:on A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:toma    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:tom     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:on   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:toma    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:tom     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:tom     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:toma    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:on   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:tom A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:oma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:om    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KYVYTÖN
[CMP=POS]:ön A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:tömä    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:töm     A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ön   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:tömä    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:töm     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:töm     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:tömä    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:ön   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:töm A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:tömä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:töm    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HAPAN
[CMP=POS]:an  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pama    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pam     A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:an     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:pama    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:pam     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:pam     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:an     A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pam A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:pama    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:pam    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LÄMMIN
[CMP=POS]:min A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pimä   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pim    A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:min A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:pimä   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:pim    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:pim    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:min A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pimä   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:pim    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:pimä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:pim    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_PAHIN
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpa   A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:mma   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:mm    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpa   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpa   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:mm    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_SISIN
[CMP=POS]:n A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpä   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:mmä   A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:mm    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:n A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpä   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:n A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpä   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mmä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:mp    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VASEN
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpa   A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:mma   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:mm    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpa A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;
[CMP=POS]:mpa   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:n A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:mpa   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
[CMP=POS]:mp    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:mm    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AAKKOSELLINEN
[CMP=POS]:nen A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:se  A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:se  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:se  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:s   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN
[CMP=POS]:nen A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:se  A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:se  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:s   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:se    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:s    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_SYMPPIS
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:kse   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ks    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:kse   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:ks    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:ks    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:s     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ks    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:kse    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LÄHTEISYYS
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:de   A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ks    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:te   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:ks    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:ks    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ks    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:de    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ks    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AUTUAS
[CMP=POS]:s A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VALMIS
[CMP=POS]:s A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:i A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:i A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TIIVIS
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:i A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:i A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
0:e    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TYÖLÄS
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VOIMAKAS
[CMP=POS]:as A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:kaa A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:as A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:kaa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kaa    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ka    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TYYLIKÄS
[CMP=POS]:äs A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:kää A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:äs A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:kää A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kää    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:kä    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_REIPAS
[CMP=POS]:as A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:paa A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:as A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:paa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:paa    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:pa    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_RIETAS
[CMP=POS]:as A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:taa A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:as A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:taa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:taa    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ta    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_RAITIS
[CMP=POS]:is A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:tii A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ti A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:is A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:tii A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ti A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:ti A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ti A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ti A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ti A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tii    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:te    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HIDAS
[CMP=POS]:das A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:taa A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:das A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:taa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:taa    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ta    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
